Illinois, session 104th, HB3729.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Sections 5 and 25 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board.9    "Credit" means one, 5, 10, or 25 cents either won or 10purchased by a player.11    "Distributor" means an individual, partnership, 12corporation, or limited liability company licensed under this 13Act to buy, sell, lease, or distribute video gaming terminals 14or major components or parts of video gaming terminals to or 15from terminal operators.16    "Electronic card" means a card purchased from a licensed 17establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, licensed 18veterans establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, or 19licensed large truck stop establishment for use in that 20establishment as a substitute for cash in the conduct of 21gaming on a video gaming terminal. 22    "Electronic voucher" means a voucher printed by an 23electronic video game machine that is redeemable in the   HB3729- 2 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1licensed establishment for which it was issued. 2    "In-location bonus jackpot" means one or more video gaming 3terminals at a single licensed establishment that allows for 4wagers placed on such video gaming terminals to contribute to 5a cumulative maximum jackpot of up to $10,000. 6    "Full-time basis" means an individual who is employed for 7a basic wage for at least 35 hours each week or who renders any 8other standard of service generally accepted by industry 9customs or practice as full-time employment. "Full-time basis" 10includes an individual for whom a W-2 is issued by a 11professional employer organization and is a full-time employee 12if he or she is employed in the service of the applicant for a 13basic wage for at least 35 hours each week. 14    "Immediate family" means a spouse, other than a spouse who 15is legally separated from the individual under a decree of 16divorce or separate maintenance, parent, grandparent, sibling, 17child, by blood, marriage, or adoption, grandchild, and 18stepchild, by blood, marriage, or adoption. 19    "Terminal operator" means an individual, partnership, 20corporation, or limited liability company that is licensed 21under this Act and that owns, services, and maintains video 22gaming terminals for placement in licensed establishments, 23licensed truck stop establishments, licensed large truck stop 24establishments, licensed fraternal establishments, or licensed 25veterans establishments.26    "Licensed technician" means an individual who is licensed   HB3729- 3 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1under this Act to repair, service, and maintain video gaming 2terminals.3    "Licensed terminal handler" means a person, including but 4not limited to an employee or independent contractor working 5for a manufacturer, distributor, supplier, technician, or 6terminal operator, who is licensed under this Act to possess 7or control a video gaming terminal or to have access to the 8inner workings of a video gaming terminal. A licensed terminal 9handler does not include an individual, partnership, 10corporation, or limited liability company defined as a 11manufacturer, distributor, supplier, technician, or terminal 12operator under this Act. 13    "Manufacturer" means an individual, partnership, 14corporation, or limited liability company that is licensed 15under this Act and that manufactures or assembles video gaming 16terminals.17    "Supplier" means an individual, partnership, corporation, 18or limited liability company that is licensed under this Act 19to supply major components or parts to video gaming terminals 20to licensed terminal operators.21    "Net terminal income" means money put into a video gaming 22terminal minus credits paid out to players.23    "Video gaming terminal" means any electronic video game 24machine that, upon insertion of cash, electronic cards or 25vouchers, or any combination thereof, is available to play or 26simulate the play of a video game, including but not limited to   HB3729- 4 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1video poker, line up, and blackjack, as authorized by the 2Board utilizing a video display and microprocessors in which 3the player may receive free games or credits that can be 4redeemed for cash. The term does not include a machine that 5directly dispenses coins, cash, or tokens or is for amusement 6purposes only.7    "Licensed establishment" means any licensed retail 8establishment where alcoholic liquor is drawn, poured, mixed, 9or otherwise served for consumption on the premises, whether 10the establishment operates on a nonprofit or for-profit basis. 11"Licensed establishment" includes any such establishment that 12has a contractual relationship with an inter-track wagering 13location licensee licensed under the Illinois Horse Racing Act 14of 1975, provided any contractual relationship shall not 15include any transfer or offer of revenue from the operation of 16video gaming under this Act to any licensee licensed under the 17Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975. Provided, however, that the 18licensed establishment that has such a contractual 19relationship with an inter-track wagering location licensee 20may not, itself, be (i) an inter-track wagering location 21licensee, (ii) the corporate parent or subsidiary of any 22licensee licensed under the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975, 23or (iii) the corporate subsidiary of a corporation that is 24also the corporate parent or subsidiary of any licensee 25licensed under the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975. 26"Licensed establishment" does not include a facility operated   HB3729- 5 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1by an organization licensee, an inter-track wagering licensee, 2or an inter-track wagering location licensee licensed under 3the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 or a riverboat licensed 4under the Illinois Gambling Act, except as provided in this 5paragraph. The changes made to this definition by Public Act 698-587 are declarative of existing law.7    "Licensed fraternal establishment" means the location 8where a qualified fraternal organization that derives its 9charter from a national fraternal organization regularly 10meets.11    "Licensed veterans establishment" means the location where 12a qualified veterans organization that derives its charter 13from a national veterans organization regularly meets.14    "Licensed truck stop establishment" means a facility (i) 15that is at least a 3-acre facility with a convenience store, 16(ii) with separate diesel islands for fueling commercial motor 17vehicles, (iii) that sells at retail more than 10,000 gallons 18of diesel or biodiesel fuel per month, and (iv) with parking 19spaces for commercial motor vehicles. "Commercial motor 20vehicles" has the same meaning as defined in Section 18b-101 21of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The requirement of item (iii) of 22this paragraph may be met by showing that estimated future 23sales or past sales average at least 10,000 gallons per month. 24    "Licensed large truck stop establishment" means a facility 25located within 3 road miles from a freeway interchange, as 26measured in accordance with the Department of Transportation's   HB3729- 6 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1rules regarding the criteria for the installation of business 2signs: (i) that is at least a 3-acre facility with a 3convenience store, (ii) with separate diesel islands for 4fueling commercial motor vehicles, (iii) that sells at retail 5more than 50,000 gallons of diesel or biodiesel fuel per 6month, and (iv) with parking spaces for commercial motor 7vehicles. "Commercial motor vehicles" has the same meaning as 8defined in Section 18b-101 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 9requirement of item (iii) of this paragraph may be met by 10showing that estimated future sales or past sales average at 11least 50,000 gallons per month. 12    "Sales agent and broker" means an individual, partnership, 13corporation, limited liability company, or other business 14entity engaged in the solicitation or receipt of business from 15current or potential licensed establishments, licensed 16fraternal establishments, licensed veterans establishments, 17licensed truck stop establishments, or licensed large truck 18stop establishments employed by a terminal operator on a 19full-time basis either on an employment or contractual basis. 20(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.) 21    (230 ILCS 40/25)22    Sec. 25. Restriction of licensees.23    (a) Manufacturer. A person may not be licensed as a 24manufacturer of a video gaming terminal in Illinois unless the 25person has a valid manufacturer's license issued under this   HB3729- 7 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1Act. A manufacturer may only sell video gaming terminals for 2use in Illinois to persons having a valid distributor's 3license.4    (b) Distributor. A person may not sell, distribute, or 5lease or market a video gaming terminal in Illinois unless the 6person has a valid distributor's license issued under this 7Act. A distributor may only sell video gaming terminals for 8use in Illinois to persons having a valid distributor's or 9terminal operator's license.10    (c) Terminal operator. A person may not own, maintain, or 11place a video gaming terminal unless he has a valid terminal 12operator's license issued under this Act. A terminal operator 13may only place video gaming terminals for use in Illinois in 14licensed establishments, licensed truck stop establishments, 15licensed large truck stop establishments, licensed fraternal 16establishments, and licensed veterans establishments. No 17terminal operator may give anything of value, including but 18not limited to a loan or financing arrangement, to a licensed 19establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 20large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 21establishment, or licensed veterans establishment as any 22incentive or inducement to locate video terminals in that 23establishment. Of the after-tax profits from a video gaming 24terminal, 50% shall be paid to the terminal operator and 50% 25shall be paid to the licensed establishment, licensed truck 26stop establishment, licensed large truck stop establishment,   HB3729- 8 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1licensed fraternal establishment, or licensed veterans 2establishment, notwithstanding any agreement to the contrary.3        (1) No terminal operator shall compensate a sales 4    agent and broker based on a (i) percentage of the 5    after-tax profits from a video gaming terminal, (ii) the 6    net terminal income from a video gaming terminal or 7    attributed to licensed establishments, licensed truck stop 8    establishments, licensed large truck stop establishments, 9    licensed fraternal establishments, and licensed veterans 10    establishments, or (iii) any other compensation metric 11    based upon the performance of a video gaming terminal in a 12    single, or series of, licensed establishments, licensed 13    truck stop establishments, licensed large truck stop 14    establishments, licensed fraternal establishments, and 15    licensed veterans establishments that such sales agent or 16    broker has procured on behalf of the terminal operator.17        (2) A terminal operator shall not enter into any 18    contract or agreement for the sharing, splitting, or 19    payment of net terminal income with any other person, 20    except as stated in paragraph (4). Any contract or 21    agreement for the sharing, splitting, or payment of net 22    terminal income with any other person executed before 23    January 1, 2025 shall not be amended, modified, or 24    extended.25        (3) No terminal operator shall compensate any person 26    other than its owner based on a (i) percentage of the   HB3729- 9 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1    after-tax profits from a video gaming terminal, (ii) the 2    net terminal income from a video gaming terminal or 3    attributed to licensed establishments, licensed truck stop 4    establishments, licensed large truck stop establishments, 5    licensed fraternal establishments, and licensed veterans 6    establishments, or (iii) any other compensation metric 7    based upon the performance of a video gaming terminal in a 8    single, or series of, licensed establishments, licensed 9    truck stop establishments, licensed large truck stop 10    establishments, licensed fraternal establishments, and 11    licensed veterans establishments, except as stated in 12    paragraph (4).13        (4) A terminal operator may enter into a contract or 14    agreement for the sharing, splitting, or payment of net 15    terminal income with any other person if such contract is 16    approved by the Board pursuant to rules adopted by the 17    Board. 18        (5) A video terminal operator that violates one or 19    more requirements of this subsection is guilty of a Class 20    4 felony and is subject to termination of his or her 21    license by the Board. 22    (d) Licensed technician. A person may not service, 23maintain, or repair a video gaming terminal in this State 24unless he or she (1) has a valid technician's license issued 25under this Act, (2) is a terminal operator, or (3) is employed 26by a terminal operator, distributor, or manufacturer.  HB3729- 10 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1    (d-5) Licensed terminal handler. No person, including, but 2not limited to, an employee or independent contractor working 3for a manufacturer, distributor, supplier, technician, or 4terminal operator licensed pursuant to this Act, shall have 5possession or control of a video gaming terminal, or access to 6the inner workings of a video gaming terminal, unless that 7person possesses a valid terminal handler's license issued 8under this Act. 9    (d-10) Solicitation of use agreements. 10        (1) A person may not solicit the signing of a use 11    agreement on behalf of a terminal operator or enter into a 12    use agreement as agent of a terminal operator unless that 13    person either has a valid sales agent and broker license 14    issued under this Act or owns, manages, or significantly 15    influences or controls the terminal operator. Any 16    compensation paid to a sales agent and broker by a 17    terminal operator must be pursuant to a written agreement 18    or written policy and submitted to the Board.19        (2) No sales agent and broker may give anything of 20    value, including, but not limited to, a loan or financing 21    arrangement, to a current or potential licensed 22    establishments, licensed truck stop establishments, 23    licensed large truck stop establishments, licensed 24    fraternal establishments, and licensed veterans 25    establishments as any incentive or inducement to locate 26    video terminals in that licensed establishments, licensed   HB3729- 11 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1    truck stop establishments, licensed large truck stop 2    establishments, licensed fraternal establishments, and 3    licensed veterans establishments. No sales agent and 4    broker shall be compensated based on a (i) percentage of 5    the after-tax profits from a video gaming terminal, (ii) 6    the net terminal income from a video gaming terminal or 7    attributed to licensed establishments, licensed truck stop 8    establishments, licensed large truck stop establishments, 9    licensed fraternal establishments, and licensed veterans 10    establishments, or (iii) any other compensation metric 11    based upon the performance of a video gaming terminal in a 12    single, or series of, licensed establishments, licensed 13    truck stop establishments, licensed large truck stop 14    establishments, licensed fraternal establishments, and 15    licensed veterans establishments that such sales agent or 16    broker has procured on behalf of a terminal operator. A 17    sales agent and broker that violates this paragraph is 18    guilty of a Class 4 felony and is subject to termination of 19    his or her license by the Board.20        (3) No sales agent and broker that is not otherwise an 21    owner of a terminal operator may solicit or procure a use 22    agreement or any other contract or agreement that purports 23    to control or authorize the placement or operation of a 24    video gaming terminal on behalf of a terminal operator 25    from a current or potential licensed establishments, 26    licensed truck stop establishments, licensed large truck   HB3729- 12 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1    stop establishments, licensed fraternal establishments, 2    and licensed veterans establishments if that person is an 3    immediate family member of (i) a direct or indirect owner, 4    (ii) officer, (iii) director, (iv) manager, (v) employee, 5    or (vi) a person who otherwise significantly influences or 6    controls the licensed establishments, licensed truck stop 7    establishments, licensed large truck stop establishments, 8    licensed fraternal establishments, and licensed veterans 9    establishments. Any use agreement that does not comply 10    with this paragraph shall be null and void.11        (4) Any use agreement currently authorizing the 12    placement and operation of video gaming may continue as a 13    valid and enforceable use agreement through the end of the 14    current use agreement term, but shall not be amended, 15    modified, extended, or renewed after the effective date of 16    this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly; 17    however, if the licensed establishments, licensed truck 18    stop establishments, licensed large truck stop 19    establishments, licensed fraternal establishments, and 20    licensed veterans establishments that is subject to an 21    agreement for the sharing, splitting, or payment of net 22    terminal income has not been authorized to go live with 23    video gaming by the Board or transitioned to a new 24    terminal operator to go live with video gaming by January 25    1, 2025, then that agreement with the sales agent shall be 26    void ab initio.   HB3729- 13 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1    (e) Licensed establishment. No video gaming terminal may 2be placed in any licensed establishment, licensed veterans 3establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 4large truck stop establishment, or licensed fraternal 5establishment unless the owner or agent of the owner of the 6licensed establishment, licensed veterans establishment, 7licensed truck stop establishment, licensed large truck stop 8establishment, or licensed fraternal establishment has entered 9into a written use agreement with the terminal operator for 10placement of the terminals. A copy of the use agreement shall 11be on file in the terminal operator's place of business and 12available for inspection by individuals authorized by the 13Board. A licensed establishment, licensed truck stop 14establishment, licensed veterans establishment, or licensed 15fraternal establishment may operate up to 6 video gaming 16terminals on its premises at any time. A licensed large truck 17stop establishment may operate up to 10 video gaming terminals 18on its premises at any time. No current or potential licensed 19establishments, licensed truck stop establishments, licensed 20large truck stop establishments, licensed fraternal 21establishments, and licensed veterans establishments shall 22accept anything of value from a terminal operator or sales 23agent and broker, as any incentive or inducement to locate 24video gaming terminals in that establishment and licensed 25establishments, licensed truck stop establishments, licensed 26large truck stop establishments, licensed fraternal   HB3729- 14 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1establishments, and licensed veterans establishments. Any 2person who violates such prohibition is guilty of a Class 4 3felony and is subject to termination of his or her license by 4the Board. 5    (f) (Blank).6    (g) Financial interest restrictions. As used in this Act, 7"substantial interest" in a partnership, a corporation, an 8organization, an association, a business, or a limited 9liability company means: 10        (A) When, with respect to a sole proprietorship, an 11    individual or his or her spouse owns, operates, manages, 12    or conducts, directly or indirectly, the organization, 13    association, or business, or any part thereof; or 14        (B) When, with respect to a partnership, the 15    individual or his or her spouse shares in any of the 16    profits, or potential profits, of the partnership 17    activities; or 18        (C) When, with respect to a corporation, an individual 19    or his or her spouse is an officer or director, or the 20    individual or his or her spouse is a holder, directly or 21    beneficially, of 5% or more of any class of stock of the 22    corporation; or 23        (D) When, with respect to an organization not covered 24    in (A), (B) or (C) above, an individual or his or her 25    spouse is an officer or manages the business affairs, or 26    the individual or his or her spouse is the owner of or   HB3729- 15 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1    otherwise controls 10% or more of the assets of the 2    organization; or 3        (E) When an individual or his or her spouse furnishes 4    5% or more of the capital, whether in cash, goods, or 5    services, for the operation of any business, association, 6    or organization during any calendar year; or7        (F) When, with respect to a limited liability company, 8    an individual or his or her spouse is a member, or the 9    individual or his or her spouse is a holder, directly or 10    beneficially, of 5% or more of the membership interest of 11    the limited liability company. 12    For purposes of this subsection (g), "individual" includes 13all individuals or their spouses whose combined interest would 14qualify as a substantial interest under this subsection (g) 15and whose activities with respect to an organization, 16association, or business are so closely aligned or coordinated 17as to constitute the activities of a single entity. 18    (h) Location restriction. A licensed establishment, 19licensed truck stop establishment, licensed large truck stop 20establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, or licensed 21veterans establishment that is (i) located within 1,000 feet 22of a facility operated by an organization licensee licensed 23under the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 or the home dock of 24a riverboat licensed under the Illinois Gambling Act or (ii) 25located within 100 feet of a school or a place of worship under 26the Religious Corporation Act, is ineligible to operate a   HB3729- 16 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1video gaming terminal. The location restrictions in this 2subsection (h) do not apply if (A) a facility operated by an 3organization licensee, a school, or a place of worship moves 4to or is established within the restricted area after a 5licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 6licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 7establishment, or licensed veterans establishment becomes 8licensed under this Act or (B) a school or place of worship 9moves to or is established within the restricted area after a 10licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 11licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 12establishment, or licensed veterans establishment obtains its 13original liquor license. For the purpose of this subsection, 14"school" means an elementary or secondary public school, or an 15elementary or secondary private school registered with or 16recognized by the State Board of Education.17    Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (h), the 18Board may waive the requirement that a licensed establishment, 19licensed truck stop establishment, licensed large truck stop 20establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, or licensed 21veterans establishment not be located within 1,000 feet from a 22facility operated by an organization licensee licensed under 23the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 or the home dock of a 24riverboat licensed under the Illinois Gambling Act. The Board 25shall not grant such waiver if there is any common ownership or 26control, shared business activity, or contractual arrangement   HB3729- 17 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1of any type between the establishment and the organization 2licensee or owners licensee of a riverboat. The Board shall 3adopt rules to implement the provisions of this paragraph.4    (h-5) Restrictions on licenses in malls. The Board shall 5not grant an application to become a licensed video gaming 6location if the Board determines that granting the application 7would more likely than not cause a terminal operator, 8individually or in combination with other terminal operators, 9licensed video gaming location, or other person or entity, to 10operate the video gaming terminals in 2 or more licensed video 11gaming locations as a single video gaming operation.12        (1) In making determinations under this subsection 13    (h-5), factors to be considered by the Board shall 14    include, but not be limited to, the following:15            (A) the physical aspects of the location;16            (B) the ownership, control, or management of the 17        location;18            (C) any arrangements, understandings, or 19        agreements, written or otherwise, among or involving 20        any persons or entities that involve the conducting of 21        any video gaming business or the sharing of costs or 22        revenues; and23            (D) the manner in which any terminal operator or 24        other related entity markets, advertises, or otherwise 25        describes any location or locations to any other 26        person or entity or to the public.  HB3729- 18 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1        (2) The Board shall presume, subject to rebuttal, that 2    the granting of an application to become a licensed video 3    gaming location within a mall will cause a terminal 4    operator, individually or in combination with other 5    persons or entities, to operate the video gaming terminals 6    in 2 or more licensed video gaming locations as a single 7    video gaming operation if the Board determines that 8    granting the license would create a local concentration of 9    licensed video gaming locations.10    For the purposes of this subsection (h-5):11    "Mall" means a building, or adjoining or connected 12buildings, containing 4 or more separate locations.13    "Video gaming operation" means the conducting of video 14gaming and all related activities.15    "Location" means a space within a mall containing a 16separate business, a place for a separate business, or a place 17subject to a separate leasing arrangement by the mall owner.18    "Licensed video gaming location" means a licensed 19establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, licensed 20veterans establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, or 21licensed large truck stop.22    "Local concentration of licensed video gaming locations" 23means that the combined number of licensed video gaming 24locations within a mall exceed half of the separate locations 25within the mall. 26    (i) Undue economic concentration. In addition to   HB3729- 19 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1considering all other requirements under this Act, in deciding 2whether to approve the operation of video gaming terminals by 3a terminal operator in a location, the Board shall consider 4the impact of any economic concentration of such operation of 5video gaming terminals. The Board shall not allow a terminal 6operator to operate video gaming terminals if the Board 7determines such operation will result in undue economic 8concentration. For purposes of this Section, "undue economic 9concentration" means that a terminal operator would have such 10actual or potential influence over video gaming terminals in 11Illinois as to:12        (1) substantially impede or suppress competition among 13    terminal operators;14        (2) adversely impact the economic stability of the 15    video gaming industry in Illinois; or16        (3) negatively impact the purposes of the Video Gaming 17    Act.18    The Board shall adopt rules concerning undue economic 19concentration with respect to the operation of video gaming 20terminals in Illinois. The rules shall include, but not be 21limited to, (i) limitations on the number of video gaming 22terminals operated by any terminal operator within a defined 23geographic radius and (ii) guidelines on the discontinuation 24of operation of any such video gaming terminals the Board 25determines will cause undue economic concentration. 26    (j) The provisions of the Illinois Antitrust Act are fully   HB3729- 20 -LRB104 10960 LNS 21042 b1and equally applicable to the activities of any licensee under 2this Act. 3(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.)